Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1537
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Unfair Insurance Claims Settlement Practices Act is to set forth standards for the investigation and disposition of claims arising under policies issued to residents of this state.

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 19.